Hawaii statutes.
§193-22 Administration. To carry out
the program authorized by this part, the governor may:

(1) Enter into an agreement or agreements, or
designate the department of labor and industrial relations, or any department
or departments of the state government as the state agency or state agencies to
enter into an agreement or agreements, with the proper authorities of the
United States;

(2) Designate the department of labor and industrial
relations, or any department or departments of the state government to design
programs which would permit or contribute to a public undertaking or service
that would not otherwise be provided, in order to provide useful work
experience opportunities for unemployed youths so that their employability may
be increased through the use of the local area youth employment programs
authorized by federal law, in accordance with the provisions of the applicable
federal law; the designated department or departments may also make appropriate
rules and regulations to carry out the programs so designed; and

(3) Defray one-half of all costs incurred with
respect to the programs, or any other proportion of the costs of the programs
which may be required by the applicable laws of the United States out of any
moneys appropriated to any department or departments which may be designated by
the governor to participate in the programs, without regard to the original
purpose of the appropriations. [L 1963, c 74, §10; Supp, §98N-23; HRS §193-22]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next